src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
быдсӧн+Pron:быдсӧн PRON_  "" ;
быдсӧн+Pron:быдсӧн PRON_  "" ;
кутшӧмакӧ+Pron+Indef:кутшӧма INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кутшӧмасӧкӧ+Pron+Indef:кутшӧмасӧ INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кутшӧмкӧ+Pron+Indef:кутшӧм INDEF-IN-KO  "jonkinlainen" ;
кутшӧмсюрӧ+Pron+Indef:кутшӧм INDEF-IN-SJURO  "jonkinlainen" ;
кыдз-мый+Pron:кыдз-мый PRON_  "" ;
кыдзкӧ+Adv+Indef:кыдз INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кыдзсюрӧ+Adv+Indef:кыдз INDEF-IN-SJURO  "" ;
кыссюрӧ+Adv+Indef:кыс INDEF-IN-SJURO  "" ;
кысянькӧ+Adv+Indef:кысянь INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кыт+Adv:кыт PronInterr  "" ;
кыткӧ+Adv+Indef:кыт INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кытчань+Adv:кытчань PronInterr  "" ;
кытчӧ-мый+Adv:кытчӧ-мый PRON_  "" ;
кытчӧдзкӧ+Adv+Indef:кытчӧдз INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кытчӧкӧ+Adv+Indef:кытчӧ INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кытчӧсюрӧ+Adv+Indef:кытчӧ INDEF-IN-SJURO  "" ;
кытчӧясӧкӧ+Adv+Indef:кытчӧясӧ INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кытысь+Adv:кытысь PronInterr  "" ;
кытысянькӧ+Adv+Indef:кытысянь INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кытӧн+Adv:кытӧн PronInterr  "" ;
кытӧнкӧ+Adv+Indef:кытӧн INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
кытӧнсюрӧ+Adv+Indef:кытӧн INDEF-IN-SJURO  "" ;
кӧнсюрӧ+Adv+Indef:кӧн INDEF-IN-SJURO  "" ;
кӧнъя+Adv:кӧнъя PronInterr  "" ;
кӧнъясынкӧ+Adv+Indef:кӧнъясын INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
месся+Adv:месся PRON_  "" ;
милы+Pron:милы PRON_  "" ;
милысь+Pron:милысь PRON_  "" ;
морта-морт+Pron:морта-морт PRON_  "" ;
мыетшкӧ+Adv+Indef:мыетш INDEF-IN-KO  "" ;
мыя+Pron:мыя PronInterr  "" ;
сыла+Pron:сыла PRON_  "" ;
